Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.810

Olympic natural resources center—Purpose, programs.

(1) The Olympic natural resources center is hereby created at the University of Washington in the school of environmental and forest sciences and the school of aquatic and fishery sciences.

(2) The Olympic natural resources center shall maintain facilities and programs in the western portion of the Olympic Peninsula. The purpose of the center is to demonstrate innovative management methods which successfully integrate environmental, energy, marine, and economic interests into pragmatic management of forest and ocean resources. The center shall combine research and educational opportunities with experimental forestry, oceans management, and traditional management knowledge into an overall program which demonstrates that management based on sound economic principles is made superior when combined with new methods of management based on ecological principles. The programs developed by the center shall include the following:

(a) Research and education on a broad range of ocean resources problems and opportunities in the region, such as estuarine processes, ocean and coastal management, renewable energy production, offshore development, fisheries and shellfish enhancement, and coastal business development, tourism, and recreation. In developing this component of the center's program, the center shall collaborate with coastal educational institutions such as Grays Harbor community college and Peninsula community college;

(b) Research and education on forest resources management issues on the landscape, ecosystem, or regional level, including issues that cross legal and administrative boundaries;

(c) Research and education that broadly integrates marine and terrestrial issues, including interactions of marine, aquatic, and terrestrial ecosystems, and that identifies options and opportunities to integrate the production of commodities with the preservation of ecological values. Where appropriate, programs shall address issues and opportunities that cross legal and administrative boundaries;

(d) Research and education on natural resources and their social and economic implications, and on alternative economic and social bases for sustainable, healthy, resource-based communities;

(e) Educational opportunities such as workshops, short courses, and continuing education for resource professionals, policy forums, information exchanges including international exchanges where appropriate, conferences, student research, and public education; and

(f) Creation of a neutral forum where parties with diverse interests are encouraged to address and resolve their conflicts.

[ 2012 c 243 s 2; 1991 c 316 s 2; 1989 c 424 s 4. Formerly RCW 76.12.210.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 316: See note following RCW 43.30.800.

Effective date—1989 c 424: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1989 c 424 s 13.]